Hawaii statutes.
§271-15 Dual operation. Unless,
for good cause shown, the public utilities commission finds or has found that
both a certificate and a permit may be so held consistently with the public
interest and with the declaration of policy declared in this chapter:

(1) No person, or any person controlling, controlled
by, or under common control with such person, shall hold a certificate as a
common carrier authorizing operation for the transportation of property by
motor vehicle within a territory if such person or any such controlling person,
controlled person, or person under common control, holds a permit as a contract
carrier authorizing operation for the transportation of property by motor
vehicle within the same territory; and

(2) No person or any person controlling, controlled
by, or under common control with such person, shall hold a permit as a contract
carrier authorizing operation for the transportation of property by motor
vehicle within a territory, if the person or any controlling person, controlled
person, or person under common control, holds a certificate as a common carrier
authorizing operation for the transportation of property by motor vehicle
within the same territory. [L 1961, c 121, pt of §2; Supp, §106C-13; HRS
§271-15]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next